Illinois, session 104th, HB4238.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.01a as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.01a)7    Sec. 5-5.01a. Supportive living facilities program. 8    (a) The Department shall establish and provide oversight 9for a program of supportive living facilities that seek to 10promote resident independence, dignity, respect, and 11well-being in the most cost-effective manner.12    A supportive living facility is (i) a free-standing 13facility or (ii) a distinct physical and operational entity 14within a mixed-use building that meets the criteria 15established in subsection (d). A supportive living facility 16integrates housing with health, personal care, and supportive 17services and is a designated setting that offers residents 18their own separate, private, and distinct living units.19     Sites for the operation of the program shall be selected 20by the Department based upon criteria that may include the 21need for services in a geographic area, the availability of 22funding, and the site's ability to meet the standards. 23    (b) Beginning July 1, 2014, subject to federal approval,   HB4238- 2 -LRB104 16609 KTG 30009 b1the Medicaid rates for supportive living facilities shall be 2equal to the supportive living facility Medicaid rate 3effective on June 30, 2014 increased by 8.85%. Once the 4assessment imposed at Article V-G of this Code is determined 5to be a permissible tax under Title XIX of the Social Security 6Act, the Department shall increase the Medicaid rates for 7supportive living facilities effective on July 1, 2014 by 89.09%. The Department shall apply this increase retroactively 9to coincide with the imposition of the assessment in Article 10V-G of this Code in accordance with the approval for federal 11financial participation by the Centers for Medicare and 12Medicaid Services. 13    The Medicaid rates for supportive living facilities 14effective on July 1, 2017 must be equal to the rates in effect 15for supportive living facilities on June 30, 2017 increased by 162.8%. 17    The Medicaid rates for supportive living facilities 18effective on July 1, 2018 must be equal to the rates in effect 19for supportive living facilities on June 30, 2018. 20    Subject to federal approval, the Medicaid rates for 21supportive living services on and after July 1, 2019 must be at 22least 54.3% of the average total nursing facility services per 23diem for the geographic areas defined by the Department while 24maintaining the rate differential for dementia care and must 25be updated whenever the total nursing facility service per 26diems are updated. Beginning July 1, 2022, upon the   HB4238- 3 -LRB104 16609 KTG 30009 b1implementation of the Patient Driven Payment Model, Medicaid 2rates for supportive living services must be at least 54.3% of 3the average total nursing services per diem rate for the 4geographic areas. For purposes of this provision, the average 5total nursing services per diem rate shall include all add-ons 6for nursing facilities for the geographic area provided for in 7Section 5-5.2. The rate differential for dementia care must be 8maintained in these rates and the rates shall be updated 9whenever nursing facility per diem rates are updated. 10    Subject to federal approval, beginning January 1, 2024, 11the dementia care rate for supportive living services must be 12no less than the non-dementia care supportive living services 13rate multiplied by 1.5. 14    (b-5) Subject to federal approval, beginning January 1, 152025, Medicaid rates for supportive living services must be at 16least 54.75% of the average total nursing facility per diem 17rate for the geographic areas defined by the Department and 18shall include all add-ons for nursing facilities for the 19geographic area provided for in Section 5-5.2. 20    (c) The Department may adopt rules to implement this 21Section. Rules that establish or modify the services, 22standards, and conditions for participation in the program 23shall be adopted by the Department in consultation with the 24Department on Aging, the Department of Rehabilitation 25Services, and the Department of Mental Health and 26Developmental Disabilities (or their successor agencies).  HB4238- 4 -LRB104 16609 KTG 30009 b1    (d) Subject to federal approval by the Centers for 2Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Department shall accept 3for consideration of certification under the program any 4application for a site or building where distinct parts of the 5site or building are designated for purposes other than the 6provision of supportive living services, but only if: 7        (1) those distinct parts of the site or building are 8    not designated for the purpose of providing assisted 9    living services as required under the Assisted Living and 10    Shared Housing Act; 11        (2) those distinct parts of the site or building are 12    completely separate from the part of the building used for 13    the provision of supportive living program services, 14    including separate entrances; 15        (3) those distinct parts of the site or building do 16    not share any common spaces with the part of the building 17    used for the provision of supportive living program 18    services; and 19        (4) those distinct parts of the site or building do 20    not share staffing with the part of the building used for 21    the provision of supportive living program services. 22    (e) Facilities or distinct parts of facilities which are 23selected as supportive living facilities and are in good 24standing with the Department's rules are exempt from the 25provisions of the Nursing Home Care Act and the Illinois 26Health Facilities Planning Act.  HB4238- 5 -LRB104 16609 KTG 30009 b1    (f) Section 9817 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 2(Public Law 117-2) authorizes a 10% enhanced federal medical 3assistance percentage for supportive living services for a 412-month period from April 1, 2021 through March 31, 2022. 5Subject to federal approval, including the approval of any 6necessary waiver amendments or other federally required 7documents or assurances, for a 12-month period the Department 8must pay a supplemental $26 per diem rate to all supportive 9living facilities with the additional federal financial 10participation funds that result from the enhanced federal 11medical assistance percentage from April 1, 2021 through March 1231, 2022. The Department may issue parameters around how the 13supplemental payment should be spent, including quality 14improvement activities. The Department may alter the form, 15methods, or timeframes concerning the supplemental per diem 16rate to comply with any subsequent changes to federal law, 17changes made by guidance issued by the federal Centers for 18Medicare and Medicaid Services, or other changes necessary to 19receive the enhanced federal medical assistance percentage. 20    (g) All applications for the expansion of supportive 21living dementia care settings involving sites not approved by 22the Department by January 1, 2024 may allow new elderly 23non-dementia units in addition to new dementia care units. The 24Department may approve such applications only if the 25application has: (1) no more than one non-dementia care unit 26for each dementia care unit and (2) the site is not located   HB4238- 6 -LRB104 16609 KTG 30009 b1within 4 miles of an existing supportive living program site 2in Cook County (including the City of Chicago), not located 3within 12 miles of an existing supportive living program site 4in Alexander, Bond, Boone, Calhoun, Champaign, Clinton, 5DeKalb, DuPage, Fulton, Grundy, Henry, Jackson, Jersey, 6Johnson, Kane, Kankakee, Kendall, Lake, Macon, Macoupin, 7Madison, Marshall, McHenry, McLean, Menard, Mercer, Monroe, 8Peoria, Piatt, Rock Island, Sangamon, Stark, St. Clair, 9Tazewell, Vermilion, Will, Williamson, Winnebago, or Woodford 10counties, or not located within 25 miles of an existing 11supportive living program site in any other county. 12    (g-5) Subject to federal approval, beginning January 1, 132027, any individual age 22 to 64 who is diagnosed as having 14Alzheimer's disease or a related dementia and is determined to 15be a person with a disability by the Social Security 16Administration shall be eligible for services in a supportive 17living dementia care setting if the individual meets all other 18eligibility requirements to receive services in a supportive 19living dementia care setting under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 146 20Subpart B and E. The Department shall apply for any federal 21waiver necessary to implement this subsection.22    (h) Beginning January 1, 2025, subject to federal 23approval, for a person who is a resident of a supportive living 24facility under this Section, the monthly personal needs 25allowance shall be $120 per month. 26    (i) As stated in the supportive living program home and   HB4238- 7 -LRB104 16609 KTG 30009 b1community-based service waiver approved by the federal Centers 2for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and beginning July 1, 32025, the Department must maintain the rate add-on implemented 4on January 1, 2023 for the provision of 2 meals per day at no 5less than $6.15 per day. 6    (j) Subject to federal approval, the Department shall 7allow a certified medication aide to administer medication in 8a supportive living facility. For purposes of this subsection, 9"certified medication aide" means a person who has met the 10qualifications for certification under Section 79 of the 11Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act and assists with 12medication administration while under the supervision of a 13registered professional nurse as authorized by Section 50-75 14of the Nurse Practice Act. The Department may adopt rules to 15implement this subsection. 16(Source: P.A. 103-102, Article 20, Section 20-5, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-102, Article 100, Section 100-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, 18Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, Article 100, 19Section 100-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, Article 165, Section 20165-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-886, eff. 218-9-24; 104-9, eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 229-12-25.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.